District of Columbia statutes.
8-241.07

Indoor Mold Assessment and Remediation Fund.

(a)

There is established a special fund the Indoor Mold Assessment Fund, which shall be administered by the District Department of the Environment in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from the fees collected in accordance with § 8-241.03 and any other money accepted for the benefit of the Fund. The Fund may be supplemented by other District funds at the Mayor’s discretion or by an act of the Council.

(c)

(1)

The Fund shall be used to administer the certification and licensing programs established under § 8-241.03 and may be used to administer grants issued under paragraph (2) of this subsection.

(2)

Where there are funds in excess of the amount needed to administer the certification and licensing programs under § 8-241.03, those funds shall be used to provide financial assistance grants to:

(A)

Low-income District residents for the purpose of having a professional mold assessment conducted in their premises, in the event that the owner of the resident’s property fails to comply with the requirements in § 8-241.04; and

(B)

Residential property owners without financial means, as determined by the Mayor, to comply with § 8-241.04.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 308, 61 DCR 6767